Idaho statutes. Title 28 COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS
Part 7
Miscellaneous Provisions

§ 28-7-701. Effective date.

This act takes effect on July 1, 2004.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-7-701, as added by 2004, ch. 42, § 2, p. 77.

§ 28-7-702. Repeals.

Existing chapter 7, title 28, Idaho Code, and section 28-10-104, Idaho Code, are repealed.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-7-702, as added by 2004, ch. 42, § 2, p. 77.

§ 28-7-703. Applicability.

This act applies to a document of title that is issued or a bailment that arises on or after July 1, 2004. This act does not apply to a document of title that is issued or a bailment that arises before July 1, 2004, even if the document of title or bailment would be subject to this act if the document of title had been issued or bailment had arisen on or after July 1, 2004. This act does not apply to a right of action that has accrued before July 1, 2004.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-7-703, as added by 2004, ch. 42, § 2, p. 77.

§ 28-7-704. Savings clause.

A document of title issued or a bailment that arises before July 1, 2004, and the rights, obligations, and interests flowing from that document or bailment are governed by any statute or other rule amended or repealed by this act as if amendment or repeal had not occurred and may be terminated, completed, consummated, or enforced under that statute or other rule.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-7-704, as added by 2004, ch. 42, § 2, p. 77.